New York, session 2025-2026, A9187.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph of paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of 2 section 3638 of the education law, as added by section 1 of subpart A of 3 part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 No later than July first, two thousand [twenty-seven] thirty, every 5 school district shall: 6 § 2. The opening paragraph of subdivision 3 of section 3638 of the 7 education law, as added by section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 8 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 9 No later than July first, two thousand [thirty-five] forty, every 10 school district shall: 11 § 3. Section 3638 of the education law is amended by adding a new 12 subdivision 4-a to read as follows: 13 4-a. A school district with an average daily attendance of fewer than 14 six hundred students or fewer than ten residences per square mile may 15 apply annually to the commissioner for a one-year extension to comply 16 with the requirements of subdivisions two and three of this section. The 17 department may grant such one-year extensions annually until the year 18 two thousand forty-five. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14002-01-5